Wyoming, session 2025, SF0126.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-17-501 through 21-17-504 are
created to read:
SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195

ARTICLE 5
TEACHER EDUCATION K-8 PUBLIC LAB SCHOOL

21-17-501. Creation of a K-8 public lab school;
purpose.

(a) There is created a public lab school to teach
kindergarten through grade eight (8) to accomplish the
following purposes:

(i) Promote developmentally appropriate
differentiated instruction that is model learner-centered
for students;

(ii) Serves as a teacher education institution
and educational learning site for pre-service teachers of
all levels;

(iii) Identifies best teaching practices that
can be utilized in public schools statewide.

SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195
(b) The public lab school established pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section shall be a coordinated
effort between the University of Wyoming and the resident
school district. For purposes of this article, "resident
school district" means the public school district that is
located where the University of Wyoming's main campus is
located.

(c) The public lab school established pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section shall be an independent
public school within the resident school district and shall
be accountable to the governing board established pursuant
to W.S. 21-17-502 for purposes of ensuring compliance with
applicable laws and the requirements of the state
constitution.

(d) The public lab school established pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section shall be located on the main
campus of the University of Wyoming. Any contract executed
between the governing body, established by W.S.
21-17-502(a), and the University of Wyoming shall be
subject to the provisions of W.S. 21-17-502(c).

SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195
21-17-502. Creation of a governing board; membership;
duties.

(a) There is created a governing board to consist of
seven (7) voting members and one (1) ex-officio, nonvoting
member to govern the operation of the public lab school
established pursuant to W.S. 21-17-501. The governing board
shall consist of the following eight (8) members:

(i) One (1) member that serves on the resident
school district's board of trustees;

(ii) The superintendent of the resident school
district, or his designee;

(iii) The dean of the University of Wyoming's
college of education, or his designee;

(iv) One (1) member appointed by the dean of the
University of Wyoming's college of education;

(v) The superintendent of public instruction, or
his designee;
SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195

(vi) One (1) teacher that instructs or will
instruct at the public lab school established pursuant to
W.S. 21-17-501 selected by the teachers that teach at the
public lab school;

(vii) One (1) parent of a student that attends
or will attend the public lab school established pursuant
to W.S. 21-17-501 selected by the parents of students that
attend the public lab school;

(viii) The principal of the public lab school
established pursuant to W.S. 21-17-501, who shall serve as
the chair of the governing board and as an ex-officio
member and shall not have the right to vote.

(b) The members of the governing board created by
subsection (a) of this section shall receive compensation,
per diem and mileage for actual time spent in performance
of their duties and traveling expenses while in attendance
and going to and from board meetings in the same manner and
amount as members of the Wyoming legislature.

SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195
(c) The governing board may negotiate and contract
with the resident school district or the University of
Wyoming, or any third party for the use of a school
building and grounds, the operation and maintenance
thereof, and the provision of any service, activity or
undertaking that the public lab school established pursuant
to W.S. 21-17-501 is required to perform in order to carry
out the educational program. Any services for which the
governing board contracts for as provided for under this
subsection shall be pursuant to a written contract. If the
contract is with the resident school district or the
University of Wyoming, the services shall be provided by
the resident school district at an incremental cost.

(d) The governing board shall have standing to sue
and be sued in its own name for the enforcement of any
contract created pursuant to this section.

(e) The governing board shall be responsible for the
operation of the public lab school established pursuant to
W.S. 21-17-501 including, but not limited to, preparation
of a budget, contracting for services and personnel
matters.
SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195

(f) The governing board, in consultation with the
University of Wyoming, shall determine educational
placements of students enrolled at the University of
Wyoming including, but not limited to, students enrolled in
teaching programs, in the public lab school established
pursuant to W.S. 21-17-501.

(g) Not later than September 1, 2025, and each
September 1 every year thereafter, the governing board
shall report to the joint education interim committee on
the implementation and administration of the public lab
school established pursuant to W.S. 21-17-501. The report
shall include at minimum:

(i) Student achievement data;

(ii) Enrollment;

(iii) The level of engagement with the
University of Wyoming's college of education in student
teacher placement;

SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195
(iv) The impact of the school on the University
of Wyoming’s teaching program;

(v) Proposed statutory modifications.

21-17-503. Admission to the public lab school;
operation; curriculum.

(a) The public lab school established pursuant to
W.S. 21-17-501 shall:

(i) Be authorized to offer any educational
program that may be offered by a school district
established pursuant to W.S. 21-3-101 through 21-3-104
unless expressly prohibited by state law;

(ii) Meet the state uniform educational program
standards imposed upon public schools by W.S. 21-9-101 and
21-9-102 and the uniform state student content and
performance standards prescribed by the state board of
education under W.S. 21-2-304, including compliance with
requirements under the statewide assessment system pursuant
to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v).
SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195

(b) The public lab school established pursuant to
W.S. 21-17-501 may operate free from specified school
district policies and state regulations. The governing
board established pursuant to W.S. 21-17-502 may waive
requirements imposed by the resident school district,
without seeking approval of the state board of education
established pursuant to W.S. 21-2-301. The state board may
waive state statutory requirements or rules promulgated by
the state board, except that the state board shall not
waive any statute or rule relating to the assessments or
standards required to be administered. Upon request of the
governing board, the state board shall provide summaries of
such regulations and policies to use in preparing a request
for a waiver from state regulations. The state department
of education established pursuant to W.S. 21-2-104 shall
prepare the summary of state regulations within existing
appropriations. Any waiver of the resident school district
regulations made pursuant to this subsection shall be for
the period of the operation of the public lab school
established pursuant to W.S. 21-17-501, except that a
waiver of state statutes or regulations by the state board
shall be subject to review every two (2) years and may be
SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195
revoked if the waiver is deemed no longer necessary by the
state board. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to
exempt the public lab school established pursuant to W.S.
21-17-501 from:

(i) Any civil rights, health or safety
requirements applicable to other public schools in the
state except as specifically provided in this article;

(ii) The student assessment and accountability
requirements applicable to other public schools;

(iii) The public records act and public meeting
requirements applicable to public schools and school
districts and any federal or state privacy laws applicable
to public schools or school districts.

(c) Admission to the public lab school established
pursuant to W.S. 21-17-501 shall be open to all students
residing within the resident school district to the extent
there is capacity within the applicable grade level at the
school. Capacity of the school shall be as determined by
the state construction department established pursuant to
SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195
W.S. 9-2-3001, but in no event shall not exceed two hundred
(200) students. If the total number of students applying
for enrollment exceeds the capacity of the public lab
school, then the school shall hold a blind lottery to
determine enrollment, except students enrolled in the
school the previous year shall be granted a seat, and
students with a sibling enrolled in the school shall be
given an enrollment preference.

21-17-504. Funding for the K-8 public lab school.

The public lab school established pursuant to W.S.
21-17-501 shall be funded through the education resource
block grant model as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv) as a
kindergarten through grade eight (8) public school within
the resident school district in the same manner and form as
a charter school in accordance with W.S. 21-3-314. Payment
shall be made to the public lab school by the resident
school district as provided under W.S. 21-3-314(c), unless
the resident district and the governing board of the public
lab school mutually agree in writing to fund the public lab
school in an alternative manner.

SF0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0195
Section 2.

(a) The public lab school established pursuant to
W.S. 21-17-501 shall accept students and commence
operations, not later than school year 2025-2026.

(b) The governing board shall begin negotiations upon
the effective date of this section to reach any agreements
necessary with the resident school district and the
University of Wyoming to begin operation of the public lab
school established pursuant to W.S. 21-17-501.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0126